test/src/morphology/V-aqlmwldw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - a’lmõldõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     a’lmõldõ+V+Inf: a’lmõldõ
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ger: a’lmõldõs
     a’lmõldõ+V+Sup: a’lmõldõm
     a’lmõldõ+V+Sup+Ine: a’lmõldõmõs
     a’lmõldõ+V+Sup+Ela: a’lmõldõmõst
     a’lmõldõ+V+Sup+Tra: a’lmõldõmõks
     a’lmõldõ+V+Sup+Abe: a’lmõldõmõt
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: a’lmõldõb
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: a’lmõldõt
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: a’lmõldõbõd
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: a’lmõldiz
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [a’lmõldizt, a’lmõldiztõ]
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [a’lmõldizt, a’lmõldiztõ]
     a’lmõldõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: a’lmõld
     a’lmõldõ+V+Cond+Sg3: a’lmõldõks
     a’lmõldõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: a’lmõld
     a’lmõldõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: a’lmõld
     a’lmõldõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: a’lmõldõgid
     a’lmõldõ+V+Jus+Sg3: a’lmõldõg
     a’lmõldõ+V+Quo+Sg3: a’lmõldiji
     a’lmõldõ+V+ActPrfPrc: a’lmõldõn
     a’lmõldõ+V+PssPrfPrc: a’lmõldõd
